Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 103
ORGANIZATION AND
CORPORATE FUNCTIONS

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2003. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL CORPORATE POWERS

PART 2 CAPITAL REQUIREMENTS

PART 3 CHARTERING A STATE BANK

PART 4 SHARES AND DISTRIBUTIONS

PART 5 DIRECTORS AND OFFICERS

PART 6 INDEMNIFICATION AND INSURANCE

PART 7 MERGER, CONSOLIDATION, CONVERSION, AND SALE OF ASSETS

PART 8 LIQUIDATION, DISSOLUTION, AND REORGANIZATION